Maryland, session 2025, HB1529.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
3–2B–01.
(a) The Baltimore County Board of Education consists of:
(1) Seven nonpartisan elected members;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1529*

HOUSE BILL 1529
(2) Four appointed members; and
(3) One student member.
(b) (1) Of the 11 elected and appointed members of the county board:
(i) 1. [One] BEFORE THE 2034 GENERAL ELECTION, ONE
member shall be elected from each of the seven councilmanic districts in the county,
established by the County Council of Baltimore County IN EXISTENCE ON OCTOBER 1,
2024, by the voters of that district; and
2. BEGINNING WITH THE 2034 GENERAL ELECTION, ONE
MEMBER SHALL BE ELECTED FROM EACH OF THE SEVEN SCHOOL BOARD DISTRICTS
ESTABLISHED BY THE REDISTRICTING PROCESS DESCRIBED IN § 3–2B–11 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, BY THE VOTERS OF THAT DISTRICT; AND
(ii) Four members shall be appointed by the Governor from the
county at large.
(2) (i) The seven elected members shall be elected at a general election
in gubernatorial election years in accordance with § 3–2B–02 of this subtitle.
(ii) The four appointed members shall be appointed by the Governor
in presidential election years from a list of nominees submitted by the Baltimore County
School Board Nominating Commission as provided in § 3–2B–03 of this subtitle:
1. On the expiration of the term of an incumbent appointed
member within 30 days after the general election; or
2. Within the 30–day period otherwise required under this
subtitle.
(3) (i) A member from a school board district shall be at least 21 years
old, a resident of that district for at least 2 years, and a registered voter of the county before
the election.
(ii) A member from a district who does not maintain residency in
that district may not continue as a member of the county board and the office shall be
deemed vacant.
(iii) If the boundary line of a district is changed, the term of an
incumbent member of the county board who no longer resides in the district because of the
change is not affected during this term.

HOUSE BILL 1529 3
(4) (i) A member may not be elected or appointed to serve on the county
board for more than three consecutive terms.
(ii) A member who has served three consecutive 4–year terms may
not be elected or appointed to the county board until at least 4 years have elapsed since the
end of the member’s last term on the county board.
(5) During an election year:
(i) The Governor may not appoint as a member of the county board
an individual who files a certificate of candidacy for election to the county board; and
(ii) An individual who files a certificate of candidacy for election to
the county board may not seek appointment to the county board by the Governor through
nomination by the Baltimore County School Board Nominating Commission.
3–2B–11.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “SCHOOL BOARD DISTRICT” MEANS THE GEOGRAPHIC
AREA OF BALTIMORE COUNTY FROM WHICH AN ELECTED MEMBER OF THE
BALTIMORE COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION IS ELECTED.
(B) (1) BEGINNING AFTER THE 2030 U. S. CENSUS, THE SCHOOL BOARD
DISTRICTS SHALL BE:
(I) REAPPORTIONED AFTER EACH DECENNIAL CENSUS OF THE
UNITED STATES; AND
(II) EFFECTIVE FOR EACH GENERAL ELECTION WHERE A
MEMBER WILL BE ELECTED UNTIL THE FOLLOWING DECENNIAL CENSUS.
(2) THE REAPPORTIONED SCHOOL BOARD DISTRICTS UNDER THIS
SECTION SHALL BE SUBSTANTIALLY EQUAL IN POPULATION.
(C) (1) AFTER EACH DECENNIAL CENSUS, THE COUNTY BOARD SHALL
SUBMIT A PROPOSAL TO THE BALTIMORE COUNTY DELEGATION TO THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY ON REAPPORTIONING THE SCHOOL BOARD DISTRICTS.
(2) THE COUNTY BOARD SHALL SUBMIT THE PROPOSAL IN
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 OF THE
CALENDAR YEAR IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING THE CENSUS.
(D) (1) THE BALTIMORE COUNTY DELEGATION TO THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 1529
(I) CONSIDER THE PROPOSAL SUBMITTED UNDER SUBSECTION
(C) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) INTRODUCE LEGISLATION TO REAPPORTION THE SCHOOL
BOARD DISTRICTS IN THE SESSION IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING THE DATE THAT THE
PROPOSAL WAS SUBMITTED.
(2) LEGISLATION INTRODUCED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY
DIFFER FROM THE PROPOSAL SUBMITTED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.